test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-ne_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - ne: # pronouns 5 'eng /est need/fin' - full paradigm
     ne+Pron+Pl+Nom: ne
     ne+Pron+Pl+Gen: nänt
     ne+Pron+Pl+Par: nēḑi
     ne+Pron+Pl+Dat: näntõn
     ne+Pron+Pl+Ins: näntkõks
     ne+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nēʼži, nēži]
     ne+Pron+Pl+Ela: nēšti
